incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    
    <sdef n="len" c="lenition ~~ séimhiú"/>
    <sdef n="ecl" c="eclipsis ~~ urú"/>
    <sdef n="tpro" c="T prothetic"/>
    <sdef n="hpro" c="H prothetic"/>
    
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>

    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="spl"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Initial mutations -->
    <pardef n="b_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bh</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mb</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>bh</l>
          <r>b<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>mb</l>
          <r>b<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gc</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>c<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>gc</l>
          <r>c<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>d<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
          <r>d<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fh</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bhf</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>fh</l>
          <r>f<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>bhf</l>
          <r>f<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>g<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>g<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>m<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p_init">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ph</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bp</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ph</l>
          <r>p<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>bp</l>
          <r>p<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sh</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>sh</l>
          <r>s<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>s<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r><s n="len"/><j/>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dt</l>
          <r><s n="ecl"/><j/>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t_init_gen">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>t<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>dt</l>
          <r>t<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mac"><par n="m_init"/><par n="m/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bailecheantar"><par n="b_init"/><i>ailecheanta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batar"><par n="b_init"/><i>ata</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bíocar"><par n="b_init"/><i>íoca</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bodhar"><par n="b_init"/><i>odha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buar"><par n="b_init"/><i>ua</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceartlár"><par n="c_init"/><i>eartlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coitéar"><par n="c_init"/><i>oitéa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="créatúr"><par n="c_init"/><i>réatú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daoscar"><par n="d_init"/><i>aosca</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dinnéar"><par n="d_init"/><i>innéa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobhriathar"><par n="d_init"/><i>obhriatha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drochfhuadar"><par n="d_init"/><i>rochfhuada</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feidhmchlár"><par n="f_init"/><i>eidhmchlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiondar"><par n="f_init"/><i>ionda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fómhar"><par n="f_init"/><i>ómha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fótaiméadar"><par n="f_init"/><i>ótaiméada</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ganntar"><par n="g_init"/><i>annta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geafar"><par n="g_init"/><i>eafa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="giar"><par n="g_init"/><i>ia</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glór"><par n="g_init"/><i>ló</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meabhairghalar"><par n="m_init"/><i>eabhairghala</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milliméadar"><par n="m_init"/><i>illiméada</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mothar"><par n="m_init"/><i>otha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pantar"><par n="p_init"/><i>anta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pílear"><par n="p_init"/><i>ílea</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pitséar"><par n="p_init"/><i>itséa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poparbhar"><par n="p_init"/><i>oparbha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sásar"><par n="s_init"/><i>ása</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seabhdar"><par n="s_init"/><i>eabhda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snasleathar"><par n="s_init"/><i>nasleatha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steigeasár"><par n="s_init"/><i>teigeasá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teanór"><par n="t_init"/><i>eanó</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tobscor"><par n="t_init"/><i>obsco</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuar"><par n="t_init"/><i>ua</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daonáireamh"><par n="d_init"/><i>aonáir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foréileamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>oréil</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="broigheall"><par n="b_init"/><i>roighea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="camall"><par n="c_init"/><i>ama</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drogall"><par n="d_init"/><i>roga</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geall"><par n="g_init"/><i>ea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meideall"><par n="m_init"/><i>eidea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="screatall"><par n="s_init"/><i>creata</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tadhall"><par n="t_init"/><i>adha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brischeol"><par n="b_init"/><i>rischeo</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carúl"><par n="c_init"/><i>arú</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhghaol"><par n="c_init"/><i>omhghao</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drochshaol"><par n="d_init"/><i>rochshao</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fál"><par n="f_init"/><i>á</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="freastal"><par n="f_init"/><i>reasta</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geál"><par n="g_init"/><i>eá</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marascal"><par n="m_init"/><i>arasca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mol"><par n="m_init"/><i>o</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="páirteagal"><par n="p_init"/><i>áirteaga</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pratancól"><par n="p_init"/><i>ratancó</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sistéal"><par n="s_init"/><i>istéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teirminéal"><par n="t_init"/><i>eirminéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turchainéal"><par n="t_init"/><i>urchainéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cohórt"><par n="c_init"/><i>ohó</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gort"><par n="g_init"/><i>o</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
